Utah statutes.
76-6-804.   "Book or other library materials" defined.

The terms "book or other library materials" as used in this act include any book, plate, picture, photograph, engraving, painting, drawing, map, newspaper, magazine, pamphlet, broadside, manuscript, document, letter, public record, microfilm, sound recording, audiovisual materials in any format, electronic data processing records, artifacts, or other documentary, written or printed materials regardless of physical form or characteristics, belonging to, on loan to, or otherwise in the custody of the following:

(1)  any public library;

(2)  any library of an educational or historical society;

(3)  any museum; or

(4)  any repository of public records.



Enacted by Chapter 168, 1981 General Session

